src/fst/lexicon.tmp.lexc
LEXICON VIIn_PL !!= @CODE@  NO LONGER NEEDED FROM AROK
+V+II: VIIn_PL_WICI ;	   !! NO LONGER NEEDED FROM AROK

!!! WICI 
!!!NOTE: II do not take this morpheme, so all forms should be null flagged.

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -w final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_WICI !!!! 
@U.wici.NULL@ VIIw_SGPL_ORDER ;

LEXICON VIIw_SG_WICI !!!! 
@U.wici.NULL@ VIIw_SG_ORDER ;

LEXICON VIIw_PL_WICI !!!! 
@U.wici.NULL@ VIIw_PL_ORDER ;

!! 	 NO LONGER NEEDED FROM AROK
!! @U.wici.NULL@ VIIw_PL_ORDER ; NO LONGER NEEDED FROM AROK

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -n final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_WICI !!!! 
@U.wici.NULL@ VIIn_SGPL_ORDER ;

LEXICON VIIn_SG_WICI !!!! 
@U.wici.NULL@ VIIn_SG_ORDER ;

!! 
!! @U.wici.NULL@ VIIw_PL_ORDER ;

LEXICON VIIn_PL_WICI !!!! 	 NO LONGER NEEDED FROM AROK
@U.wici.NULL@ VIIn_PL_ORDER ; !!!! NO LONGER NEEDED FROM AROK

!!! ORDERS

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -w final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_ORDER !!= @CODE@ 
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VIIw_SGPL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIw_SGPL_FUT_CON_PERSON ;

! @U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VIIw_IND_PERSON ; !
! @U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIw_CNJ_PERSON ; !
! @U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIw_FUT_CON_PERSON ;!

LEXICON VIIw_SG_ORDER !!= @CODE@ singular only
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@  VIIw_SG_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIw_SG_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIw_SG_FUT_CON_PERSON ;!

LEXICON VIIw_PL_ORDER !!= @CODE@ singular only
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@  VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIw_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON ;!

!! LEXICON VIIw_PL_ORDER !!= @CODE@ plural only 
!! @U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
!! @U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
!! @U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIw_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON ;!

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -n final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_ORDER !!= @CODE@ 
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VIIn_SGPL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIn_SGPL_FUT_CON_PERSON ;!

LEXICON VIIn_SG_ORDER !!= @CODE@ singular only
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VIIn_SG_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIn_SG_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIn_SG_FUT_CON_PERSON ;!

LEXICON VIIn_PL_ORDER !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VIIn_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIn_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON ;!

!!! TENSES

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -w final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_SGPL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_SGPL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VIIw_SGPL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_SGPL_IND_PERSON ; !

LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ; !

LEXICON VIIw_SG_IND_TENSE !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_SG_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_SG_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VIIw_SG_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_SG_IND_PERSON ; !

LEXICON VIIw_SG_CNJ_TENSE !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_SG_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_SG_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_SG_CNJ_PERSON ; !

LEXICON VIIw_PL_IND_TENSE !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ; !

LEXICON VIIw_PL_CNJ_TENSE !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !

!! LEXICON VIIw_PL_IND_TENSE !!= @CODE@ plural only
!! @U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
!! @U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
!! @U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
!! @U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
!! 
!! LEXICON VIIw_PL_CNJ_TENSE !!= @CODE@ plural only
!! @U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
!! @U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
!! @U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -n final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIn_SGPL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIn_SGPL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VIIn_SGPL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIn_SGPL_IND_PERSON ; !

LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ; !

LEXICON VIIn_SG_IND_TENSE !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIn_SG_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIn_SG_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VIIn_SG_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIn_SG_IND_PERSON ; !

LEXICON VIIn_SG_CNJ_TENSE !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIn_SG_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIn_SG_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIn_SG_CNJ_PERSON ; !

LEXICON VIIn_PL_IND_TENSE !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIn_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIn_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VIIn_PL_IND_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIn_PL_IND_PERSON ; !

LEXICON VERBSTEMS
asamonwa:asamon VIIn_PL ;
cikawâsisinwa:cikawâsisin VIIn_PL ;
cikawâsisiwanwa:cikawâsisiwan VIIn_PL ;
itahtinwa:itahtin VIIn_PL ;
kakwâyakêyatinwa:kakwâýakêyatin VIIn_PL ;
mâwasakopayinwa:mâwasakopaýin VIIn_PL ;
mihcênwa:mihcên VIIn_PL ;
mihcêtinwa:mihcêtin VIIn_PL ;
nahiskâtomakanwa:nahiskâtomakan VIIn_PL ;
nêwinwa:nêwin VIIn_PL ;
nêwowanwa:nêwowan VIIn_PL ;
nistinwa:nistin VIIn_PL ;
nîsinwa:nîsin VIIn_PL ;
osâmêyatinwa:osâmêyatin VIIn_PL ;
